Nevada, session 83, AB242.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 232.162 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.162 1. The Sagebrush Ecosystem Council is hereby
created in the Department. The Council consists of:
(a) The following nine voting members appointed by the
Governor:
(1) One member who represents agricultural interests;
(2) One member who represents the energy industry;
(3) One member who represents the general public;
(4) One member who represents conservation and
environmental interests;
(5) One member who represents mining interests;
(6) One member who represents ranching interests;
(7) One member who represents local government;
(8) One member who acts as a liaison for Native American
tribes; and
(9) One member of the Board of Wildlife Commissioners or
his or her designee.
(b) In addition to the members appointed pursuant to paragraph
(a), the following nonvoting members:
(1) The Director of the State Department of Conservation
and Natural Resources;
(2) The Director of the Department of Wildlife;
(3) The Director of the State Department of Agriculture;
(4) The State Director of the Nevada State Office of the
Bureau of Land Management;
(5) The State Supervisor of the Nevada State Office of the
United States Fish and Wildlife Service;
(6) The Forest Supervisor for the Humboldt-Toiyabe
National Forest; and
(7) Any other members appointed by the Governor as
nonvoting members.
2. The provisions of subsection 6 of NRS 232A.020 do not
apply to the appointment by the Governor of the members of the
Council.
3. After the initial terms, each member of the Council
appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and subparagraph (7) of paragraph (b)
of subsection 1 serves a term of 4 years, commencing on July 1.
4. A vacancy in the membership of the Council must be filled
in the same manner as the original appointment for the remainder of
the unexpired term. A member may be reappointed.
-
*AB242_R1*

– 3 –
5. While engaged in the business of the Council, each voting
member is entitled to receive a salary of not more than $80 per day,
as established by the Council, and the per diem allowance and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
6. The Council may:
(a) Adopt regulations to govern the management and operation
of the Council;
(b) Establish subcommittees consisting of members of the
Council to assist the Council in the performance of its duties; and
(c) Consider and require the recovery of costs related to
activities prescribed by paragraph (d) of subsection 2 of NRS
321.594 pursuant to NRS 701.600 to 701.640, inclusive, or any
other authorized method of recovering those costs.
7. The Council shall:
(a) Consider the best science available in its determinations
regarding the conservation of the greater sage grouse (Centrocercus
urophasianus) and sagebrush ecosystems in this State;
(b) Establish and carry out strategies for:
(1) The conservation of the greater sage grouse and
sagebrush ecosystems in this State; and
(2) Managing land which includes those sagebrush
ecosystems, taking into consideration the importance of those
sagebrush ecosystems and the interests of the State;
(c) Establish and carry out a long-term system for carrying out
strategies to manage sagebrush ecosystems in this State using an
adaptive management framework and providing for input from
interested persons and governmental entities;
(d) Oversee any team within the Division of State Lands of the
Department which provides technical services concerning sagebrush
ecosystems;
(e) Establish by regulation a program to mitigate damage to
sagebrush ecosystems in this State by authorizing a system that
awards credits to persons, federal and state agencies, local
governments and nonprofit organizations to protect, enhance or
restore sagebrush ecosystems;
(f) Solicit suggestions and information and, if necessary,
prioritize projects concerning the enhancement of the landscape, the
restoration of habitat, the reduction of nonnative grasses and plants
and the mitigation of damage to or the expansion of scientific
knowledge of sagebrush ecosystems;
(g) If requested, provide advice for the resolution of any conflict
concerning the management of the greater sage grouse or a
sagebrush ecosystem in this State;
(h) Coordinate and facilitate discussion among persons, federal
and state agencies and local governments concerning the
-
*AB242_R1*

– 4 –
maintenance of sagebrush ecosystems and the conservation of the
greater sage grouse;
(i) Provide information and advice to persons, federal and state
agencies and local governments concerning any strategy, system,
program or project carried out pursuant to this section or NRS
321.592 or 321.594; and
(j) Provide direction to state agencies concerning any strategy,
system, program or project carried out pursuant to this section or
NRS 321.592 or 321.594 and resolve any conflict with any direction
given by another state board, commission or department jointly with
that board, commission or department, as applicable.
8. In establishing a program to mitigate damage to sagebrush
ecosystems pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 7, the Council
shall set forth in regulation:
(a) The process for a person, federal or state agency, local
government or nonprofit organization to apply to participate in the
program by:
(1) Proposing an activity or project that will create credits
to protect, enhance or restore sagebrush ecosystems; or
(2) Acquiring debits to compensate for the loss or
degradation of habitat of the greater sage-grouse caused by a
proposed activity or project;
(b) The process for the review of an application described in
paragraph (a) by the Council;
(c) The process by which a person, federal or state agency,
local government or nonprofit organization that applies to
participate in the program pursuant to paragraph (a) may appeal
any decision of the Council relating to the application; and
(d) The process by which the Council will periodically review
any activity or project that has been approved by the Council to
create credits or acquire debits pursuant to the program.
9. On or before June 30 and December 31 of each year, the
Council shall submit a written report to the Governor. The report
must include, without limitation:
(a) Information concerning the overall health and population of
the greater sage grouse within this State and in the United States and
the overall health of sagebrush ecosystems within this State,
including, without limitation, information concerning any threats to
the population of sage grouse and any sagebrush ecosystems within
this State;
(b) Information concerning all strategies, systems, programs and
projects carried out pursuant to this section and NRS 321.592 and
321.594, including, without limitation, information concerning the
costs, sources of funding and results of those strategies, systems,
programs and projects; and
-
*AB242_R1*

– 5 –
(c) Any other information specified by the Council.
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 31, 2027, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB242_R1*